test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-PFV-ni-tsazid_wake-up_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - ts'ázíd[wake-up] :
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg1:       ts'ánissid
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg2:       ts'ánízid
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg3:       ts'ánízid
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl1:       [ts'ániìzid, ts'ánaàzid]
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl1+Distr: [ts'ádàniìzid, ts'ádànaàzid]
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl2:       ts'ánassid
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl2+Distr: ts'ádànassid
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl3:       ts'ágìnízid
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Pfv+SbjPl3+Distr: ts'ádàgìnízid
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg4:       ts'áts'ìnízid
    ts'ázíd+V+I+Pfv+SbjSg4+Distr: ts'ádàts'ìnízid
